Alaska, session 34, SB151.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 14.30 is amended by adding a new section to read: 04 Sec. 14.30.144. Head lice policy in public schools. (a) A school district shall 05 provide students and families with information about how to prevent head lice and 06 adopt a policy regarding students with live head lice. The policy must provide that a 07 student found with live head lice may remain in the student's classroom until the end 08 of the school day but following that school day may not return to the classroom until a 09 certificated school nurse or the certificated school nurse's designee, or other health 10 care provider if the school does not employ a certificated school nurse, has inspected 11 the student's hair and confirmed the absence of live head lice. Upon discovering live 12 head lice in a student's hair, the student's school shall provide the student's parent or 13 guardian with information about how to treat head lice. 14 (b) Subject to appropriation, each fiscal year, the department shall reimburse a 15 school district an amount equal to 20 percent of the district's cost to employ a 01 certificated school nurse if 02 (1) the nurse works at a school in the district that serves grades 03 kindergarten through eight; 04 (2) the district employs the nurse on at least a half-time basis; 05 (3) the district checks at least 95 percent of enrolled students for live 06 head lice in a manner that protects student privacy on or before October 15 of each 07 year; and 08 (4) the district submits a report to the department by July 1 of each 09 year that 10 (A) describes the district's policy adopted under (a) of this 11 section; 12 (B) describes the information the district provides to a student's 13 parents under (a) of this section; 14 (C) describes, for the previous school year, how many students 15 were found to have live head lice and how many days of school each student 16 missed because of live head lice; and 17 (D) confirms that the district checked at least 95 percent of 18 enrolled students for live head lice in a manner that protected student privacy 19 on or before October 15 of the previous year. 20 (c) If the amount appropriated for funding under (b) of this section is 21 insufficient to fully reimburse each eligible school district, the department shall reduce 22 each reimbursement in proportion to the amount of the shortfall. 23 (d) In this section, "school district" has the meaning given in AS 14.30.350. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.